Hawaii statutes.
[§211F-33] Purposes and terms of
investments. (a) Investments may be used for any purpose consistent with
the purposes and objectives of this chapter.

(b) Investments may be made on such terms and
conditions as the corporation shall determine to be reasonable, appropriate,
and consistent with the purposes and objectives of this chapter. [L 1990, c
110, pt of §3]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next